Nevada, session 83, SB174.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 388 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act.
Sec. 1.3. 1. The board of trustees of each school district
and the governing body of each charter school shall develop a
policy prescribing the manner in which a pupil with a disability
who has an individualized education program or a plan developed
in accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
29 U.S.C. § 794, must, subject to the consent of his or her parent
or legal guardian, receive medically necessary treatment, as
authorized by an insurer, third-party payor or person paying for
-
*SB174_R1*

– 4 –
the treatment, or the services of private instructional personnel in
a school setting.
2. A policy developed pursuant to this section must:
(a) Require each school within the district or the charter
school, as applicable, to provide notice to the parent or legal
guardian of an enrolled pupil with a disability of the right of the
pupil to:
(1) Request access to medically necessary treatment, as
authorized by an insurer, third-party payor or person paying for
the treatment, in a school setting pursuant to section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and Title II of the
Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131 et
seq.; and
(2) Appeal the decision of a school district or charter school
concerning his or her access to the medically necessary treatment
or services of private instructional personnel in the school setting
pursuant to NRS 388.463;
(b) Set forth the protocols for private instructional personnel
to:
(1) Observe, in a classroom setting, the pupil who receives
his or her services; and
(2) After obtaining written authorization from the parent or
legal guardian of the pupil to whom such treatment is provided,
collaborate with educational personnel employed by the school
district or charter school, as applicable, in the provision of services
to the pupil, including, without limitation, collaboration
concerning:
(I) The provision of medically necessary treatment;
(II) The planning of services provided to the pupil; and
(III) Interdisciplinary communication;
(c) Comply with the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.; and
(d) Not require the school district or charter school to pay for
any treatment or services addressed by the policy.
3. The board of trustees of a school district or the governing
body of a charter school shall:
(a) Not charge a fee to a pupil or a parent or legal guardian of
the pupil relating to the provision of services by private
instructional personnel in a school setting rendered under a policy
developed pursuant to subsection 2.
(b) Only impose requirements for private instructional
personnel that include requiring private instructional personnel
to:
-
*SB174_R1*

– 5 –
(1) Carry a policy of professional liability insurance at a
level of coverage required by the board of trustees of the school
district or the governing body of the charter school, as applicable;
(2) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 388A.516 or
391.105, as applicable, undergo an investigation into his or her
background conducted pursuant to NRS 388A.515 or 391.104, as
applicable;
(3) Adhere to any relevant state and federal privacy laws,
including, without limitation, the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, and any regulations
adopted pursuant thereto, and the Health Insurance Portability
and Accountability Act of 1996, Public Law 104-191, as amended,
and applicable regulations; and
(4) Adhere to any relevant requirements, statutes,
regulations, rules and policies of the school district or charter
school, as applicable.
4. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall make available, on
the Internet website of the school district or charter school, as
applicable, and to a parent or legal guardian of a pupil who
requests a copy, the policy developed pursuant to this section.
5. If a pupil receives medically necessary treatment from
private instructional personnel in a school setting pursuant to this
section and the treatment is related to a need identified in an
individualized education program or a plan developed in
accordance with section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29
U.S.C. § 794, for the pupil, the board of trustees of the school
district or governing body of the charter school, as applicable, may
require the parent or legal guardian of the pupil to sign a written
acknowledgment that:
(a) The school district or charter school, as applicable, is
relieved of its obligation to provide services for the same purpose
as the services provided by the private instructional personnel in a
school setting.
(b) The school district or charter school, as applicable:
(1) Has not offered, and does not offer, accept or assume
any duty to pay any private instructional personnel;
(2) Has no financial responsibility to any private
instructional personnel regarding services provided by such a
person; and
(3) Where such documentation is required by a health care
plan for the pupil, is not responsible for documenting, billing or
preparing and submitting reports concerning services provided by
any private instructional personnel.
-
*SB174_R1*

– 6 –
(c) The individualized education program team for the pupil
must include any private instructional personnel who provide
services to the pupil pursuant to this section.
6. The provision of medically necessary treatment by private
instructional personnel pursuant to this section does not relieve
the board of trustees of a school district or the governing body of a
charter school from its obligation to:
(a) Provide a pupil who receives such treatment with a free
and appropriate public education in accordance with the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et
seq.; or
(b) Adhere to any relevant federal or state laws or regulations
concerning pupils with disabilities.
7. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall, on or before July 1 of
each year, compile and submit to the Department a report that
includes:
(a) The total number of requests made pursuant to this section
by a pupil with a disability for access to medically necessary
treatment in a school setting; and
(b) The number of such requests that were authorized or
denied.
8. On or before January 1 of each year, the Department
shall:
(a) Post the reports received pursuant to subsection 5 on the
Internet website of the Department; and
(b) Submit the reports received pursuant to subsection 5:
(1) In odd-numbered years, to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the Senate and
Assembly Standing Committees on Education; and
(2) In even-numbered years, to the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Interdisciplinary communication” means the exchange of
information between professionals in different fields of expertise
for the purpose of collaboration.
(b) “Medically necessary treatment” means any medically
necessary habilitative or rehabilitative care, prescription care,
psychiatric care, psychological care, behavioral therapy or
therapeutic care identified by a qualified provider of health care
for the treatment of disabilities.
(c) “Private instructional personnel” means a person who is
hired or contracted by the parent or legal guardian of a pupil, or
authorized by an insurer or third-party payor, to provide services
to the pupil as:
-
*SB174_R1*

– 7 –
(1) An assistant behavior analyst, behavior analyst or
registered behavior technician who is registered, certified or
licensed pursuant to chapter 641D of NRS;
(2) A speech-language pathologist who is licensed pursuant
to chapter 637B of NRS;
(3) An occupational therapist who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 640A of NRS;
(4) A physical therapist who is licensed pursuant to chapter
640 of NRS;
(5) A psychologist who is licensed pursuant to chapter 641
of NRS; or
(6) A clinical social worker who is licensed pursuant to
chapter 641B of NRS.
Sec. 1.7. 1. The ability of a pupil with a visual impairment,
including, without limitation, blindness, or a hearing impairment,
including, without limitation, deafness, to carry a cane or walking
stick while on school property must not be interfered with or
disturbed by any employee of the school district or charter school
in which the pupil is enrolled.
2. The provisions of this section apply regardless of whether
the pupil does not take advantage of the special provisions for the
education of pupils with disabilities pursuant to NRS 388.431.
Sec. 2. NRS 388.417 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.417 As used in NRS 388.417 to 388.515, inclusive [:] ,
and sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act:
1. “Communication mode” means any system or method of
communication used by a person with a disability, including,
without limitation, a person who is deaf or whose hearing is
impaired, to facilitate communication which may include, without
limitation:
(a) American Sign Language;
(b) English-based manual or sign systems;
(c) Oral and aural communication;
(d) Spoken and written English, including speech reading or lip
reading; and
(e) Communication with assistive technology devices.
2. “Dyslexia” means a neurological learning disability
characterized by difficulties with accurate and fluent word
recognition and poor spelling and decoding abilities that typically
result from a deficit in the phonological component of language.
3. “Dyslexia intervention” means systematic, multisensory
intervention offered in an appropriate setting that is derived from
evidence-based research.
4. “Individualized education program” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(A).
-
*SB174_R1*

– 8 –
5. “Individualized education program team” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d)(1)(B).
6. “Provider of special education” means a school within a
school district or charter school that provides education or services
to pupils with disabilities or any other entity that is responsible for
providing education or services to a pupil with a disability for a
school district or charter school.
7. “Pupil who receives early intervening services” means a
person enrolled in kindergarten or grades 1 to 12, inclusive, who is
not a pupil with a disability but who needs additional academic and
behavioral support to succeed in a regular school program.
8. “Pupil with a disability” means a “child with a disability,” as
that term is defined in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(3)(A), who is under 22
years of age.
9. “Response to scientific, research-based intervention” means
a collaborative process which assesses a pupil’s response to
scientific, research-based intervention that is matched to the needs
of a pupil and that systematically monitors the level of performance
and rate of learning of the pupil over time for the purpose of making
data-based decisions concerning the need of the pupil for
increasingly intensified services.
10. “Specific learning disability” means a disorder in one or
more of the basic psychological processes involved in understanding
or using spoken or written language which is not primarily the result
of a visual, hearing or motor impairment, intellectual disability,
serious emotional disturbance, or an environmental, cultural or
economic disadvantage. Such a disorder may manifest itself in an
imperfect ability to listen, think, speak, read, write, spell or perform
mathematical calculations. The term includes, without limitation,
perceptual disabilities, brain injury, minimal brain dysfunction,
dyslexia and developmental aphasia.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 388.419 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.419 1. The Department shall:
(a) Prescribe a form that contains the basic information
necessary for the uniform development, review and revision of an
individualized education program for a pupil with a disability in
accordance with 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d); and
(b) Make the form available on a computer disc for use by
school districts and, upon request, in any other manner deemed
reasonable by the Department.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each school
district shall ensure that the form prescribed by the Department is
used for the development, review and revision of an individualized
education program for each pupil with a disability who receives
special education in the school district. A school district may use an
-
*SB174_R1*

– 9 –
expanded form that contains additions to the form prescribed by the
Department if the basic information contained in the expanded form
complies with the form prescribed by the Department.
3. The State Board:
(a) Shall prescribe minimum standards for the special education
of pupils with disabilities.
(b) May prescribe minimum standards for the provision of early
intervening services.
4. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board must
include standards for programs of instruction or special services
maintained for the purpose of serving pupils with:
(a) Hearing impairments, including, but not limited to, deafness.
(b) Visual impairments, including, but not limited to, blindness.
(c) Orthopedic impairments.
(d) Speech and language impairments.
(e) Intellectual disabilities.
(f) Multiple impairments.
(g) Emotional disturbances.
(h) Other health impairments.
(i) Specific learning disabilities.
(j) Autism spectrum disorders.
(k) Traumatic brain injuries.
(l) Developmental delays.
5. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with hearing impairments, including, without limitation,
deafness, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 4 must comply
with:
(a) The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
§§ 1400 et seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(b) The effective communication requirement of Title II of the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131 et
seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(c) Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. §
794, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with visual impairments, including, without limitation,
blindness, pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 4 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Standards for the provision of instruction in Braille and
the use of Braille; and
(b) Guidelines for providing for and integrating assistive
technology and assistive technology services into instruction
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 388.437.
-
*SB174_R1*

– 10 –
7. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with dyslexia pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection 4 must
include, without limitation, standards for instruction on:
(a) Phonemic awareness to enable a pupil to detect, segment,
blend and manipulate sounds in spoken language;
(b) Graphonomic knowledge for teaching the sounds associated
with letters in the English language;
(c) The structure of the English language, including, without
limitation, morphology, semantics, syntax and pragmatics;
(d) Linguistic instruction directed toward proficiency and
fluency with the patterns of language so that words and sentences
are carriers of meaning; and
(e) Strategies that a pupil may use for decoding, encoding, word
recognition, fluency and comprehension.
[7.] 8. No apportionment of state money may be made to any
school district or charter school for the instruction of pupils with
disabilities until the program of instruction maintained therein for
such pupils is approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
as meeting the minimum standards prescribed by the State Board.
[8.] 9. The Department shall, upon the request of the board of
trustees of a school district, provide information to the board of
trustees concerning the identification and evaluation of pupils with
disabilities in accordance with the standards prescribed by the State
Board.
[9.] 10. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department the data that is submitted to the
United States Secretary of Education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1418
within 30 days after submission of the data to the Secretary in a
manner that does not result in the disclosure of data that is
identifiable to an individual pupil.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Assistive technology” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “assistive technology device” in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(1). The
term includes, without limitation:
(1) A laptop computer;
(2) A tablet device;
(3) Large-print reading materials;
(4) Braille technology installed on a computer or handheld
device;
(5) Audio materials;
(6) Software that converts text to speech; and
(7) Artificial intelligence.
(b) “Assistive technology service” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(2).
-
*SB174_R1*

– 11 –
Sec. 3. NRS 388.4352 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.4352 1. Any person or governmental entity may request
the Superintendent of Public Instruction to determine whether a
provider of special education is in compliance with the Individuals
with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., NRS
388.417 to 388.5243, inclusive, and sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act,
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto, or any other law or
regulation governing the education of pupils with disabilities in this
State.
2. Upon receipt of a request pursuant to subsection 1 or upon
his or her own initiative, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
must determine whether there is good cause to conduct an
inspection of the provider of special education. If the Superintendent
of Public Instruction determines there is good cause to conduct an
inspection, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall cause such
an inspection to be conducted by the Department within 30 days
after making the determination. An inspection conducted pursuant to
this subsection may be conducted on-site, electronically or by
telephone.
3. If, after an inspection conducted pursuant to subsection 2,
the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that a provider
of special education is not in compliance with a law or regulation
governing the education of pupils with disabilities, the
Superintendent of Public Instruction must, not more than 30 days
after completion of the inspection:
(a) Meet with the provider of special education to determine the
most efficient and expeditious manner in which to bring the
provider of special education into compliance with the law or
regulation; and
(b) Request the board of trustees of the school district or the
governing body of the charter school, as applicable, to establish a
plan of corrective action pursuant to NRS 385.175 to ensure
compliance with the law or regulation.
Sec. 4. NRS 388.4354 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.4354 1. If a provider of special education fails or refuses
to comply in a timely manner with a plan of corrective action
established pursuant to NRS 385.175 or with an order of a hearing
officer issued pursuant to a due process hearing conducted pursuant
to the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§
1400 et seq., or pursuant to an appeal therefrom, the Superintendent
of Public Instruction must take appropriate measures to ensure
compliance with the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20
U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., NRS 388.417 to 388.5243, inclusive, and
sections 1.3 and 1.7 of this act, any regulations adopted pursuant
-
*SB174_R1*

– 12 –
thereto, or any other law or regulation governing the education of
pupils with disabilities in this State.
2. In determining the appropriate measures to take to ensure
compliance with the laws and regulations governing the education
of pupils with disabilities, the Superintendent of Public Instruction
must consider:
(a) The severity of the failure to comply with the plan of
corrective action or the order of the hearing officer and the length
and number of times that the provider of special education has been
out of compliance with the laws and regulations governing the
education of pupils with disabilities;
(b) Whether the provider of special education made a good faith
effort to comply with the plan of corrective action or the order of the
hearing officer;
(c) The impact on pupils served by the provider of special
education of the failure to comply with the plan of corrective action
or the order of the hearing officer; and
(d) Whether the provider of special education has previously
failed to comply with such a plan of corrective action or order of a
hearing officer.
3. The actions which the Superintendent of Public Instruction
may take to ensure compliance pursuant to subsection 1 after
considering the factors set forth in subsection 2 include, without
limitation:
(a) Extending the time by which the provider of special
education must comply with the plan of corrective action;
(b) Revising the plan of corrective action;
(c) Requiring the school district or the governing body of the
charter school, as applicable, to provide technical assistance to the
provider of special education to assist with compliance with
the laws and regulations governing the education of pupils with
disabilities;
(d) Requiring the school district or the governing body of the
charter school, as applicable, to provide appropriate professional
development for the provider of special education to assist with
compliance with the laws and regulations governing the education
of pupils with disabilities;
(e) Ordering an investigation of compliance by the provider of
special education or additional inspections of the provider of special
education to ensure compliance with the laws and regulations
governing the education of pupils with disabilities, or both;
(f) Requiring the school district or charter school, as
appropriate, to assign one or more persons to monitor compliance
with the plan of corrective action or order of the hearing officer and
-
*SB174_R1*

– 13 –
the laws and regulations governing the education of pupils with
disabilities by the provider of special education;
(g) Notwithstanding any collective bargaining agreement or
contract of employment to the contrary, requiring the school district
or charter school, as applicable, to take appropriate disciplinary
action against a principal or other administrator who knowingly and
willfully fails to comply with a plan of corrective action or order of
a hearing officer;
(h) Requiring the provider of special education to attend a public
meeting of the State Board to explain the failure of the provider of
special education to comply with a plan of corrective action or order
of a hearing officer, address public concerns and outline the actions
that the provider of special education intends to take to ensure
compliance with the laws and regulations governing the education
of pupils with disabilities;
(i) Taking punitive action against the provider of special
education, which may include, without limitation:
(1) To the extent possible, redirecting money provided by the
Federal Government for administrative costs related to the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et
seq.; or
(2) To the extent possible, withholding, in whole or in part,
any federal or state apportionment to the provider; or
(j) Seeking enforcement of a plan of corrective action or the
order of a hearing officer in a court of competent jurisdiction.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction may work with any
other appropriate governmental entity to carry out the provisions of
subsection 3.
Sec. 4.5. NRS 388.437 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.437 1. When developing an individualized education
program for a pupil with a hearing impairment in accordance with
NRS 388.419, the pupil’s individualized education program team
shall consider, without limitation:
(a) The related services and program options that provide the
pupil with an appropriate and equal opportunity for communication
access;
(b) The pupil’s primary communication mode;
(c) The availability to the pupil of a sufficient number of age,
cognitive, academic and language peers of similar abilities;
(d) The availability to the pupil of adult models who are deaf or
hearing impaired and who use the pupil’s primary communication
mode;
(e) The availability of special education teachers, interpreters
and other special education personnel who are proficient in the
pupil’s primary communication mode;
-
*SB174_R1*

– 14 –
(f) The provision of academic instruction, school services and
direct access to all components of the educational process,
including, without limitation, advanced placement courses, career
and technical education courses, recess, lunch, extracurricular
activities and athletic activities;
(g) The preferences of the parent or guardian of the pupil
concerning the best feasible services, placement and content of the
pupil’s individualized education program; and
(h) The appropriate assistive technology necessary to provide
the pupil with an appropriate and equal opportunity for
communication access.
2. When developing an individualized education program for
a pupil with a visual impairment, including, without limitation,
blindness, or a hearing impairment, including, without limitation,
deafness, in accordance with NRS 388.419, the pupil’s
individualized education program team shall, without limitation:
(a) If the parent or legal guardian of the pupil requests that
the pupil receive instruction in Braille and the use of Braille,
provide for instruction in Braille and the use of Braille;
(b) Provide that the pupil receive any assistive technology and
assistive technology services necessary to provide the pupil with a
free appropriate public education pursuant to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.; and
(c) Include in the individualized education program a
requirement that the ability of the pupil to carry a cane or walking
stick or use a mobility device while on school property must not be
interfered with or disturbed by any employee of the school district
or charter school in which the pupil is enrolled pursuant to section
1.7 of this act.
3. When developing an individualized education program for a
pupil with a hearing or visual impairment who is less than 6 years of
age, including, without limitation, such a pupil with both hearing
and visual impairments, in accordance with NRS 388.419, the
pupil’s individualized education program team shall use the criteria
prescribed pursuant to NRS 388.519, in addition to any methods of
assessment required by federal law, to evaluate the pupil’s
development of language and literacy skills and to determine
whether to modify the individualized education program. If the team
determines that the pupil is not making adequate progress in the
development of language and literacy skills, the team must include
in the plan:
(a) A detailed explanation of the reasons that the pupil is not
making adequate progress; and
(b) Recommendations for services and programs to assist the
pupil’s development of language and literacy skills.
-
*SB174_R1*

– 15 –
[3.] 4. When developing an individualized education program
for a pupil pursuant to this section, the pupil’s individualized
education program team shall, to the maximum extent
appropriate, provide for the placement of the pupil in the least
restrictive environment pursuant to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1412(a)(5). In making this
determination of placement, the team shall:
(a) Consider any potentially harmful effects on the pupil and
the quality of any special education services required by the pupil
if the pupil is placed in a general education classroom;
(b) Provide for the placement of the pupil in a general
education classroom unless the team determines that the pupil
cannot receive a free appropriate public education in the least
restrictive environment in a general education classroom, even
with the provision of supplementary aids and services and assistive
technology and assistive technology services;
(c) Include the basis for the determination of placement in the
individualized education program for the pupil; and
(d) Comply with the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.
5. When determining the best feasible instruction to be
provided to the pupil in his or her primary communication mode, the
pupil’s individualized education program team may consider,
without limitation:
(a) Changes in the pupil’s hearing or vision;
(b) Development in or availability of assistive technology;
(c) The physical design and acoustics of the learning
environment; and
(d) The subject matter of the instruction to be provided.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Assistive technology” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “assistive technology device” in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(1). The
term includes, without limitation:
(1) A laptop computer;
(2) A tablet device;
(3) Large-print reading materials;
(4) Braille technology installed on a computer or handheld
device;
(5) Audio materials;
(6) Software that converts text to speech; and
(7) Artificial intelligence.
(b) “Assistive technology service” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(2).
(c) “General education classroom” means a classroom that is
primarily tailored for the instruction of pupils without disabilities.
-
*SB174_R1*

– 16 –
(d) “Supplementary aids and services” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(33).
Sec. 5. NRS 388A.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.510 “Volunteer” means any person who, without
compensation, works at, assists with or oversees any activity or
event conducted or sponsored by a charter school during or outside
of school hours. The term:
1. Includes, without limitation, [a coach,] :
(a) A coach, assistant coach, director of in-school or
extracurricular activities and chaperone of any overnight trip.
(b) Any private instructional personnel who provides services
in a private setting within a school to a pupil with a disability who
has an individualized education program pursuant to section 1.3
of this act.
2. Does not include:
(a) A student who is enrolled at an institution of higher
education and is:
(1) Taking a course which requires the student to be present
in the classroom of the charter school on a limited basis to observe
and to be observed in the classroom; and
(2) Under direct supervision of a teacher or his or her
professor at all times while in the classroom.
(b) An employee of a business, agency or organization that
participates in a work-based learning program pursuant to NRS
389.167, other than an employee who directly oversees the
participation of or has unsupervised contact with a pupil in the
work-based learning program.
Sec. 6. NRS 391.1035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.1035 “Volunteer” means any person who, without
compensation, works at, assists with or oversees any activity or
event conducted or sponsored by a public school during or outside
of school hours. The term:
1. Includes, without limitation, [a coach,] :
(a) A coach, assistant coach, director of in-school or
extracurricular activities and chaperone of an overnight trip.
(b) Any private instructional personnel who provides services
in a private setting within a school to a pupil with a disability who
has an individualized education program pursuant to section 1.3
of this act.
2. Does not include:
(a) A student who is enrolled at an institution of higher
education and is:
(1) Taking a course which requires the student to be present
in the classroom of the public school on a limited basis to observe
and to be observed in the classroom; and
-
*SB174_R1*

– 17 –
(2) Under direct supervision of a teacher or his or her
professor at all times while in the classroom.
(b) An employee of a business, agency or organization that
participates in a work-based learning program pursuant to NRS
389.167, other than an employee who directly oversees the
participation of or has unsupervised contact with a pupil in the
work-based learning program.
Sec. 7. The provisions of subsection 1 of NRS 218D.380 do
not apply to any provision of this act which adds or revises a
requirement to submit a report to the Legislature.
Sec. 8. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 9. 1. This section and sections 7 and 8 of this act
become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 6, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB174_R1*